Hawaii statutes.
§651-5 Additional security. [(a)] The
defendant may at any time before judgment move the court for additional
security on the part of the plaintiff, and if, on the motion, the court is
satisfied that any surety on the plaintiff's bond has removed from the State,
or that the surety is not sufficient, the attachment may be vacated and
restitution directed of any property taken under it, unless in a reasonable
time, to be fixed by the court, further security is given by the plaintiff in
such amount and form as shall be approved by the court.

[(b)] In case the defendant obtains judgment
the defendant shall be entitled to have taxed against the plaintiff as costs,
in addition to such other costs as may be allowed by law, a reasonable
attorney's fee of not more than $50, to be fixed by the court. [L 1905, c 84,
§5; am L 1909, c 60, §3; RL 1925, §2809; RL 1935, §4194; RL 1945, §10145; RL
1955, §233-5; HRS §651-5; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 22 H. 1, 3 (1914).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next